New Jersey, session 221, S3213.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An institution of higher education shall not establish any scholarship fund or student assistance program that is only available to students enrolled in the institution who are citizens or permanent residents of a country or territory that is controlled by a foreign terrorist organization as designated by the United States Secretary of State pursuant to 8 U.S.C. s.1189. b.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, an institution that violates the provisions of this section shall be prohibited from receiving: (1) State operating aid; (2) the proceeds of State-supported revenue bonds that are issued by the New Jersey Educational Facilities Authority; (3) the proceeds of State general obligation bonds; or (4) funds awarded to a student enrolled in the institution and distributed through any State student assistance or scholarship program administered by the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.